Utah statutes.
54-10a-301.   Powers and duties of office.
(1)  The office shall:
(a)  assess the impact of utility rate changes and other regulatory actions
related to an applicable public utility on:
(i)  residential consumers; and
(ii)  small commercial consumers;
(b)  assist a residential consumer or a small commercial consumer in appearing
before the commission; and
(c)  through its director, advocate, on the office's own behalf and in its own
name, a position most advantageous to:
(i)  residential consumers; and
(ii)  small commercial consumers.
(2) (a)  The director may bring an original action in the name of the office
before:
(i)  the commission; or
(ii)  a court having appellate jurisdiction over an order or decision of the
commission.
(b)  The director on behalf of the office may:
(i)  commence an original proceeding, file a complaint, appear as a party,
appeal, or otherwise represent residential consumers or small commercial
consumers in a matter or a proceeding involving regulation of an applicable
public utility pending before one or more of the following of the federal
government:
(A)  an officer, department, board, agency, commission, or governmental
authority; or
(B)  a court; or
(ii)  intervene in, protest, resist, or advocate the granting, denial, or
modification of a petition, application, complaint, or other proceeding,
decision, or order of a governmental authority of the federal government.
